Tennessee, session 114, SB0352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-46-102(b), is amended by adding
the following sentence to the end of the subsection:
The chief executive officer of each state agency and department shall ensure that such
policies, practices, and procedures are posted on the respective agency's or
department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0352
001947
- 1 -